Delaware, session 153, HB107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 6601(2) Title 18 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: w. Constables commissioned pursuant to Chapter 56 of Title 24; or x. 911 dispatchers, as defined under Â§ 10002 of Title 16 . or y. Persons who qualified previously as a âcovered personâ under this section whose death proximately resulted from an action by a person seeking retaliation against the previously covered person relating to performing the duties of their former office or position.